New York, session 2025-2026, A11410.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 4402 of the education law, as 2 amended by chapter 371 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 5. Notwithstanding any provisions of this article to the contrary or 5 the provisions of section thirty-two hundred two of this chapter, a 6 child with a disability who reaches the age of [twenty-one] twenty-two 7 during (a) the period commencing with the first day of July and ending 8 on the thirty-first day of August shall if otherwise eligible, be enti- 9 tled to continue in a July and August program until the thirty-first day 10 of August or until the termination of the summer program, whichever 11 shall first occur; or (b) the period commencing on the first day of 12 September and ending on the thirtieth day of June shall be entitled to 13 continue in such program until the thirtieth day of June or until the 14 termination of the school year, whichever shall first occur. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15647-01-6